Hawaii statutes.
§183-13 Hearing. At the time and place
named, a full hearing shall be given by the department of land and natural
resources, to all who desire to be heard upon the subject matter of the
notice. The hearing shall be public, and shall be conducted under such rules
as the department may adopt. [L 1903, c 44, §9; RL 1925, §591; RL 1935, §180;
RL 1945, §1015; RL 1955, §19-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§1; HRS §183-13; am L 1988, c 337, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next